Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1451.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "alcohol service personnel" in section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Alcohol service personnel" shall mean any employe of a licensee such as a bartender, waiter or, in the case of a distributor or importing distributor, a salesperson whose primary responsibility includes the resale, furnishing or serving of liquor or malt or brewed beverages. It shall also mean [any]:(1) Any employe, such as a doorperson, whose primary responsibility is to ascertain the age of individuals who are attempting to enter the licensed premises.(2) Any employe or independent contractor of a transporter-for-hire whose responsibility it is to deliver alcohol to nonlicensees.* * *Section 2. Sections 415(a) and 415.1(a) of the act are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 415. Wine Expanded Permits.--(a) * * *(12) Wine provided to a Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder or its employe or independent contractor shall fulfill the requirements of this subsection without the need to use a transaction scan device or a register on the licensed premises.* * *Section 415.1. Ready-to-Drink Cocktail Permit.--(a) * * *(12) Ready-to-drink cocktails provided to a Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder or its employe or independent contractor shall fulfill the requirements of this subsection without the need to use a transaction scan device or a register 20250HB1451PN1699 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the licensed premises.* * *Section 3. Section 471 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 471. Revocation and Suspension of Licenses; Fines.--* * *(g) If a transporter-for-hire licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 493(1), the administrative law judge shall impose a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both. Any subsequent violations within three years of a prior violation shall be subject to increasing penalty amounts which shall range from a minimum increase of one hundred dollars ($100) more than the prior fine amount to an amount not to exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000) per violation.Section 4. Section 471.1(a), (g) and (h) of the act are amended to read:Section 471.1. Responsible Alcohol Management.--(a) The board is authorized to offer a responsible alcohol service program to licensees. The program shall consist of four parts: new employe orientation, training for alcohol service personnel, manager/owner training and the displaying of responsible alcohol service signage. New employe orientation shall consist of orienting newly hired alcohol service personnel as to Pennsylvania law relating to the sale, furnishing or serving of alcoholic beverages to minors and visibly intoxicated persons. It shall also mean orienting newly hired alcohol service personnel to responsible server practices, as the term is defined by the board, through regulation. Training for alcohol service personnel shall be as set forth by the board, but at 20250HB1451PN1699 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minimum it shall consist of training to prevent service of alcohol to minors and to visibly intoxicated persons. For alcohol service personnel who deliver alcohol for a Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder, the training shall consist of orienting employes and independent contractors of Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holders on issues related to the delivery of alcohol off the licensed premises to nonlicensees, including on the topics listed in section 505.6(g). Manager/owner training shall be as set forth by the board, but at a minimum it shall consist of training on how to monitor employes, proper service of alcohol and how to develop an appropriate alcohol service policy. The responsible alcohol service signage shall be as set forth by the board and shall consist of signage dealing with the licensee's policy against sales to minors and visibly intoxicated persons. Alcohol service personnel training may be conducted by the board or by an entity certified by the board to conduct such training.* * *(g) Unless successfully completed prior to appointment, a manager appointed by any restaurant, eating place retail dispenser, hotel, club, limited distillery licensee or distributor licensee shall be required to complete the manager/owner training under subsection (c) within one hundred eighty days of approval of appointment by the board. A manager shall maintain their status of being trained by successfully completing the training program every two years.(h) Unless successfully completed prior to being hired, all alcohol service personnel shall be required to complete the training for alcohol service personnel under subsection (b) within six months of being hired by a licensed establishment. 20250HB1451PN1699 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Alcohol service personnel shall maintain their status of being trained by successfully completing the training program every two years.Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 505.6. Transporters for Hire.--(a) Except as provided under subsection (b), a person who transports alcohol for hire within this Commonwealth shall obtain a Transporter-for-Hire Class A license, a Transporter-for-Hire Class B license, a Transporter-for-Hire Class C license or a Transporter-for-Hire Class D license from the board as provided under this section.(b) Alcohol may be transported without a transporter-for-hire license under any of the following conditions:(1) If the alcohol in question is denatured alcohol.(2) If the alcohol in question is for the personal use of, and not for resale by, the transporter.(3) If transportation is by a licensee of the board whose license or permit authorizes the transportation of liquor, malt or brewed beverages or alcohol in the regular operation of the licensee's business.(4) If transportation is by a person who transports alcohol through this Commonwealth commercially and not for delivery within this Commonwealth, including transportation accomplished by scheduled common air carriers of mail and passengers and by common carriers by railroad, subject to regulation by the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission. Transportation under this paragraph shall be subject to the following conditions:(i) The operator of the vehicle shall have in the operator's possession at all times while in this Commonwealth an invoice and a bill of lading or waybill showing the brand name, size and 20250HB1451PN1699 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 number of containers of liquor, malt or brewed beverages or alcohol being transported, which shall be produced for inspection upon the request of a police officer, board employe or enforcement officer.(ii) The cargo must remain intact and upon the same vehicle or conveyance while in this Commonwealth, unless prevented by an accident or other similarly uncontrollable circumstance.(5) If there is no charge associated with the transportation of the alcohol.(6) If the malt or brewed beverages, wine or liquor are being transported by hand, without the use of a motorized vehicle, by a person employed by the licensee or transporter-for-hire licensee from the licensed premises to a customer located in his or her vehicle who had previously ordered and paid for the alcohol online or paid for the alcohol in person in the licensed premises, provided that the customer's vehicle is located at a designated curbside location outside the licensed premises or otherwise in close proximity to the exterior of the building housing the licensed premises.(c) (1) Each transporter-for-hire license application shall be submitted to the board and shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the board. The application shall be accompanied by application and license fees as provided under section 614-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929. The license shall be issued for the calendar year, and the license fee shall be prorated quarterly, as provided under section 508.(2) A Transporter-for-Hire Class D license application shall be subject to the same fees as a Transporter-for-Hire Class A license, but shall also be subject to a five thousand dollar 20250HB1451PN1699 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ($5,000) initial surcharge and an annual renewal of one thousand dollars ($1,000). A Transporter-for-Hire Class D license shall only be available to a person who is primarily engaged in the business of transporting and delivering items or who holds a retail license issued by the board.(d) The board shall issue a transporter-for-hire license as follows:(1) A Transporter-for-Hire Class A license shall authorize the holder to engage in the commercial transportation of all forms of alcohol to or from points located in this Commonwealth.(2) A Transporter-for-Hire Class B license shall authorize the holder to engage in the commercial transportation of malt or brewed beverages only, to or from points located in this Commonwealth.(3) A Transporter-for-Hire Class C license shall authorize the holder to engage a fleet of vehicles in the commercial transportation of all forms of alcohol to or from points located in this Commonwealth.(4) A Transporter-for-Hire Class D license shall authorize the holder to engage in the commercial transportation of all forms of alcohol to or from points located in this Commonwealth. The following shall apply:(i) A Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder may accept alcohol orders on behalf of licensees and permittees who are authorized to sell alcohol for off-premises consumption for delivery to unlicensed customers only. Such orders may be placed through telephonic orders or through web-based platforms owned and operated by the licensee, the permittee or by the Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder, provided that the sale of alcohol is made solely by the licensee or permittee 20250HB1451PN1699 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized to sell alcohol for off-premises consumption.(ii) A Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder may accept alcohol orders on behalf of the board for delivery to unlicensed customers only. Such orders may be placed through telephonic orders or through web-based platforms owned and operated by the board or by the Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder, provided that the sale of alcohol is made solely by the board. Payments for the alcohol may be accepted by the Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder from unlicensed purchasers only and the payments shall be transferred directly to the licensed seller or to the board in the normal course of business.(iii) A Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder must enter into a written agreement with the selling licensee or selling permittee authorizing the transporter to provide delivery services to the licensee or permittee prior to providing delivery services, and the Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder must enter into a written agreement with the board authorizing the transporter to provide delivery services prior to providing delivery services. A copy of each agreement shall be maintained by the Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder, selling licensee and selling permittee as a business record and shall be made available upon request to the board and to the enforcement bureau.(e) A transporter-for-hire license holder shall maintain and keep, in hard copy or electronic media consistent with generally accepted accounting procedures, for a period of at least two (2) years, complete and accurate daily records of transactions conducted under the authority of the license and shall take reasonable steps to protect personally identifiable information, 20250HB1451PN1699 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consistent with applicable law. Records shall be subject to inspection by authorized representatives of the board and enforcement bureau. Copies of reports or forms required by Federal or State governmental agencies related to the licensed operation shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years unless required to be maintained for a longer period by the Federal or State agency. The reports or forms shall also be open to inspection by authorized representatives of the board and enforcement bureau.(f) A transporter-for-hire license holder who is delivering alcohol to a nonlicensee must require proof of age of the recipient before delivering the alcohol. Proof of age may only be established by presenting one of the forms of identification under section 495(a). The delivery person must use a transaction scan device as the term is defined in section 495(g) to confirm the validity of the identification before delivering the alcohol. The customer accepting the alcohol must provide the customer's signature to the delivery person.(g) All employes or independent contractors of a transporter-for-hire that deliver alcohol to nonlicensees shall be considered alcohol service personnel under the responsible alcohol management online training program authorized under section 471.1 or an approved transporter-for-hire delivery training program.(1) A transporter-for-hire may submit to the board for approval its delivery training program for alcohol service personnel who deliver alcohol to nonlicensees.(i) The board shall approve a transporter-for-hire's delivery training programs that includes the following:(A) methods to identify and prevent sales to minors or 20250HB1451PN1699 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 visibly intoxicated persons;(B) acceptable forms of identification;(C) fake or altered identification; and(D) procedures for checking identification.(ii) Upon receipt of a proposed delivery training program from a transporter-for-hire, the board has thirty (30) business days to approve, deny, or request modifications to the proposed delivery training program.(iii) An approved delivery training program under this section shall be considered a responsible alcohol service program under section 471.1.(h) While transporting alcohol, an employe or independent contractor of a transporter-for-hire license holder shall carry in the vehicle the following documentation, which may be in electronic or paper form, and which the employe or independent contractor must be able to readily produce upon demand of the board, the enforcement bureau or a law enforcement official or other authorized agency:(1) Documentation showing the license holder's name, address, including the street name and number as shown on the license, and the license number as shown on the license. The license identification number shall be preceded by the letters "P.L.C.B."(2) Documentation, in the form of an order or invoice or similar documentation, identifying the name and address of the licensee responsible for the sale of the alcohol being delivered, and identifying the name and address the recipient to whom the driver is making the delivery.(i) A transporter-for-hire license holder shall be considered a "licensee" for purposes of section 493. A 20250HB1451PN1699 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transporter-for-hire license holder that violates section 493(1) shall be subject to the citation process and penalties provided for in section 471(g).(j) A selling licensee, selling permittee or the board responsible for the sale of alcohol intended for delivery by a transporter-for-hire to a nonlicensee shall label the outer packaging containing the alcohol to clearly indicate that the package contains alcohol, unless one of the following conditions is met:(1) the alcohol service personnel delivering the order has personally retrieved and bagged or otherwise packaged the alcohol for delivery; or(2) the alcohol service personnel is notified through electronic or other means that the delivery order contains alcohol and that the recipient must be twenty-one (21) years of age or older.(k) A selling licensee, selling permittee or the board shall not be criminally or civilly liable for sales or service of alcohol to a minor or to a visibly intoxicated person if the order for the alcohol in question was processed by a Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder unless the selling licensee, selling permittee or the board knew or should have known that the alcohol was being purchased by or delivered to a minor or visibly intoxicated person, or unless the selling licensee, selling permittee or the board has failed to comply with subsection (j).(l) A Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder, or an employe or independent contractor of a Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder, shall not be required to display information on a vehicle used to deliver alcohol to a 20250HB1451PN1699 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonlicensee, or to otherwise identify a vehicle used to deliver alcohol to a nonlicensee, including with information related to the Transporter-for-Hire Class D license holder's license number or address or with reference to the "P.L.C.B."Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1451PN1699 - 12 - 12345